Indiana, session 2026, HB1235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-30-3-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) an activity specifically authorized by:
(A) IC 4-29 or IC 4-29.5 (tribal gaming and tribal-state
compact);
(B) IC 4-31 (pari-mutuel wagering on horse races);
(C) IC 4-33 (riverboat gambling);
(D) IC 4-35 (gambling games at racetracks); or
(E) IC 4-38 (sports wagering); or
(F) IC 4-39.5 (video gaming);
(2) the purchase of a tangible lottery ticket for a lottery game
from:
(A) a retailer authorized to sell lottery tickets under IC 4-30-9;
or
(B) the commission; or
(3) a free:
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


(A) interactive game; or
(B) promotional game;
offered by the commission.
(b) Unless specifically granted authority by a statute passed by the
general assembly, the commission and Indiana gaming commission
shall not, independently or by public-private partnership, operate or
authorize the use or operation of the following:
(1) A lottery game operated through a video lottery terminal.
(2) A video gaming terminal.
(3) A lottery courier service.
(4) The sale of digital representations of:
(A) casino-style games, including:
(i) poker;
(ii) roulette;
(iii) slot machines; or
(iv) blackjack;
over the Internet;
(B) scratch-off games; or
(C) draw games.
SECTION 2. IC 4-32.3-1-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This article applies only to a qualified
organization.
(b) This article applies only to the following approved gambling
activities conducted as fundraising activities by qualified organizations:
(1) Bingo events, casino game nights, raffles, festivals, and other
gaming activities approved by the commission.
(2) The sale of pull tabs, punchboards, and tip boards:
(A) at bingo events, casino game nights, raffles, and festivals
conducted by qualified organizations; or
(B) at any time on the premises owned or leased by qualified
organizations and regularly used for the activities of qualified
organizations.
This article does not apply to any other sale of pull tabs,
punchboards, and tip boards.
(c) This article does not apply to a promotion offer subject to
IC 24-8.
(d) This article does not apply to the following:
(1) A type II gambling game authorized by IC 4-36.
(2) A raffle or other gambling game authorized by IC 4-36-5-1(b).
(3) Video gaming authorized by IC 4-39.5.
(e) This article does not apply to a prize linked savings program
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


that:
(1) is offered or conducted by an eligible financial institution
under IC 28-1-23.2;
(2) is:
(A) offered or conducted by a credit union organized or
reorganized under United States law; and
(B) conducted in the same manner as a prize linked savings
program under IC 28-1-23.2; or
(3) is:
(A) offered or conducted by an insured depository institution
(as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813) that is:
(i) a national bank formed under 12 U.S.C. 21;
(ii) a state member bank (as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813);
(iii) a state nonmember bank (as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813);
or
(iv) a savings association (as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813);
and
(B) conducted in the same manner as a prize linked savings
program under IC 28-1-23.2.
SECTION 3. IC 4-39.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 39.5. VIDEO GAMING TERMINALS IN
ESTABLISHMENTS
Chapter 1. General Provisions
Sec. 1. This article applies only to wagering on video gaming
terminals located in licensed establishments under a video gaming
terminal installation contract described in IC 4-39.5-8.
Sec. 2. All shipments of video gaming terminals to a
manufacturer, distributor, supplier, operator, or establishment in
Indiana, the registering, recording, and labeling of which have
been completed by the manufacturer or dealer in accordance with
15 U.S.C. 1171 through 15 U.S.C. 1178, are legal shipments of
gambling devices into Indiana.
Sec. 3. Under 15 U.S.C. 1172, approved January 2, 1951, the
state of Indiana, acting by and through elected and qualified
members of the general assembly, declares that the state is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 1172.
Sec. 4. (a) This section does not apply to real or personal
property taxes imposed by a local taxing unit.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (e), local governmental
authority concerning all matters relating to video gaming
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


conducted under this article is preempted by the state.
(c) No tax or fee, except as provided in this article, may be
assessed or collected from a licensee by a political subdivision
having the power to assess or collect a tax or fee. This section does
not prohibit the assessment and levying of property taxes otherwise
authorized by law or the imposing of a special assessment
(including a ditch or drainage assessment, Barrett Law assessment,
improvement assessment, sewer assessment, or sewage assessment)
otherwise authorized by law to be imposed on property to be
benefited by an improvement.
(d) A political subdivision may not enter into an agreement with
a licensee that requires any financial commitments from the
licensee that are in addition to the fees and taxes imposed under
this article.
(e) An ordinance prohibiting video gaming in existence on June
30, 2026, is preempted by this article. However, the legislative body
of:
(1) a city or town may pass an ordinance to prohibit video
gaming within the corporate limits of the city or town; or
(2) a county may pass an ordinance to prohibit video gaming
in the unincorporated area of the county;
after June 30, 2026.
Sec. 5. This article will maintain the public's confidence and
trust through:
(1) comprehensive law enforcement supervision; and
(2) the strict regulation of facilities, persons, associations, and
video gaming at establishments.
Chapter 2. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 2. "Adjusted gross receipts" means the difference between:
(1) a person's gross receipts; minus
(2) prizes paid out to patrons by the person.
Sec. 3. "Commission" refers to the Indiana gaming commission
established by IC 4-33-3-1.
Sec. 4. "Convenience store" refers to a store or food mart that
is primarily engaged in:
(1) the retail sale of a line of goods that may include milk,
bread, soda, and snacks; or
(2) the retail sale of automotive fuels and the retail sale of a
line of goods that may include milk, bread, soda, and snacks.
Sec. 5. "Department" refers to the department of state revenue.
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


Sec. 6. "Distributor" means a person licensed under this article
to:
(1) buy a video gaming terminal from a manufacturer; and
(2) sell, lease, or otherwise distribute a video gaming terminal
or major components or parts of a video gaming terminal to
an operator.
Sec. 7. "Establishment" means any of the following locations
licensed to have video gaming terminals on the premises:
(1) A veterans organization establishment.
(2) A fraternal organization establishment.
(3) Except as provided in IC 4-39.5-5-13(b)(5), an
establishment licensed under IC 7.1-3 to sell alcoholic
beverages to customers for consumption on the premises of
the establishment.
(4) A truck stop establishment.
Sec. 8. "Fraternal organization establishment" means an
organization or institution that:
(1) is organized and conducted on a nonprofit basis;
(2) is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(3) is a branch, lodge, or chapter of a national organization;
and
(4) exists for the common charitable purposes, brotherhood,
and other interests of its members.
Sec. 9. "Gambling game" means a game played on a video
gaming terminal approved for wagering under this article by the
commission.
Sec. 10. "Gross receipts" means the total amount of money
wagered, either by cash or ticket, by patrons on a video gaming
terminal in an establishment.
Sec. 11. "Licensee" means a person holding a license issued
under this article.
Sec. 12. "Manufacturer" means a person that is licensed under
this article to:
(1) manufacture or assemble video gaming terminals; and
(2) sell video gaming terminals to a distributor.
Sec. 13. "Operator" means a person that is licensed under this
article to own or lease, install, maintain, and operate video gaming
terminals at an establishment located in Indiana.
Sec. 14. "Patron" means an individual who wagers on gambling
games played on a video gaming terminal.
Sec. 15. "Payment ticket" means a ticket dispensed by a video
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


gaming terminal in exchange for credits accumulated on a video
gaming terminal.
Sec. 16. "Payout device" means a device that redeems a
payment ticket with cash.
Sec. 17. "Person" means an individual, a sole proprietorship, a
partnership, an association, a fiduciary, a corporation, a limited
liability company, or any other business entity.
Sec. 18. "Supplier" means a person that is licensed under this
article to supply major components or parts for video gaming
terminals and payout devices.
Sec. 19. "Truck stop establishment" means a premises that:
(1) is equipped with diesel islands designated for fueling
commercial motor vehicles (as defined in IC 9-13-2-31);
(2) has sold at retail on average more than fifty thousand
(50,000) gallons of diesel or biodiesel fuel each month over the
previous twelve (12) months, or, in the case of an
establishment that has been open for less than twelve (12)
months, is expected to average more than fifty thousand
(50,000) gallons in retail sales of diesel or biodiesel fuel each
month;
(3) has parking spaces designated for commercial motor
vehicles (as defined in IC 9-13-2-31); and
(4) has a convenience store.
Sec. 20. "Vendor" means a person that provides or proposes to
provide goods or services to the commission. The term does not
include an employee of the commission, a licensed establishment,
a licensee, or a state agency.
Sec. 21. "Veterans organization establishment" means an
organization or institution that is:
(1) organized and conducted on a nonprofit basis;
(2) exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)
of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(3) a branch or chapter of a national veterans organization.
Sec. 22. "Video gaming terminal" means an electronic video
gaming machine that:
(1) is available for consideration in the form of cash or a ticket
to play or simulate the play of a gambling game, including
poker, line up, and blackjack, using a video display and
microprocessors; and
(2) awards winning players with free games or credits that
may be redeemed for cash.
The term does not include a machine that directly dispenses coins,
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


cash, or tokens or is for amusement purposes only.
Sec. 23. "Video gaming terminal installation contract" means
a contractual agreement between:
(1) an operator or a person eligible to apply for an operator's
license; and
(2) an establishment or a person eligible to apply for an
establishment license;
that sets forth the terms and conditions for the placement,
installation, and operation of video gaming terminals on the
premises of the establishment.
Chapter 3. Powers and Duties of the Indiana Gaming
Commission
Sec. 1. The commission has jurisdiction and supervision over the
following:
(1) All video gaming operations in Indiana.
(2) All patrons in establishments.
Sec. 2. (a) The commission has the following powers for the
purpose of administering, regulating, and enforcing the system of
video gaming established under this article:
(1) All powers and duties specified in this article.
(2) All powers necessary and proper to fully and effectively
execute this article.
(3) The power to conduct hearings and to issue subpoenas for
the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for
the production of books, records, and other relevant
documents.
(4) The power to administer oaths and affirmations to
witnesses.
(5) The power to revoke, suspend, or renew licenses issued
under this article.
(6) The power to hire employees, gather information, conduct
investigations, and carry out other tasks under this article.
(b) The commission has the following duties for the purpose of
administering, regulating, and enforcing the system of video
gaming established under this article:
(1) To investigate and reinvestigate applicants, vendors,
suppliers, establishments, and licensees.
(2) To take appropriate administrative enforcement or
disciplinary action against a person regulated under this
article.
(3) To investigate alleged violations of this article.
(4) To take any reasonable or appropriate action to enforce
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


this article.
Sec. 3. (a) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for
the following purposes:
(1) Administering this article.
(2) Establishing the conditions under which video gaming in
Indiana may be conducted.
(3) Providing for the prevention of practices detrimental to
the public interest and providing for the best interests of video
gaming in Indiana.
(4) Imposing penalties for noncriminal violations of this
article.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for the
purposes described in subsection (a) to enable video gaming in
Indiana to commence as soon as possible after June 30, 2026.
Sec. 4. The commission shall do the following:
(1) Conduct all hearings concerning civil violations of this
article.
(2) Levy and collect penalties for noncriminal violations of
this article.
(3) Deposit the penalties in the state general fund.
Sec. 5. The commission shall adopt standards for the licensing
of the following:
(1) Persons regulated under this article.
(2) Equipment necessary to conduct video gaming.
Sec. 6. The commission shall issue a request for proposals for a
central communications system vendor and enter into a contract
with a central communications system vendor.
Sec. 7. The commission shall issue a request for proposals for an
independent outside testing laboratory for the examination of video
gaming terminals and associated equipment as required by this
article. The commission shall enter into contracts with at least two
(2) independent outside testing laboratories.
Sec. 8. If a licensee or an employee of a licensee violates this
article or engages in a fraudulent act, the commission may do any
combination of the following:
(1) Suspend, revoke, or restrict the license of the licensee.
(2) Require the removal of the licensee or employee of a
licensee.
(3) Impose a civil penalty or fine upon the licensee or
employee.
Sec. 9. (a) The commission shall employ investigators.
(b) An investigator employed by the commission is vested with
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


full police powers and duties to enforce this article.
(c) An investigator may issue a summons for an infraction or a
misdemeanor violation if the defendant promises to appear by
signing the summons. A defendant who signs a summons issued
under this subsection but fails to appear is subject to the penalties
provided by IC 35-44.1-2-10. Upon the defendant's failure to
appear, the court shall issue a warrant for the arrest of the
defendant.
(d) In addition to the powers and duties vested under subsection
(b), an investigator may act as an officer for the arrest of offenders
who violate the laws of Indiana if the investigator reasonably
believes that a crime has been, is being, or is about to be committed
or attempted in the investigator's presence.
Sec. 10. The commission shall establish the minimum amount of
insurance that must be maintained by an operator or an
establishment.
Chapter 4. Applicant Information
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to an applicant for any of the
following:
(1) A manufacturer license.
(2) A distributor license.
(3) A supplier license.
(4) An operator license.
(5) An establishment license.
Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), an applicant for
a manufacturer license, distributor license, supplier license,
operator license, or establishment license must provide the
following information:
(1) The name, business address, and business telephone
number of the applicant.
(2) The following information for an applicant that is not an
individual:
(A) The state of the applicant's incorporation or
registration.
(B) The names of all directors and officers.
(3) The identity of the following:
(A) Any person in which the applicant has an equity
interest of at least one percent (1%) of all shares. The
identification must include the state of incorporation or
registration, if applicable. However, an applicant that has
a pending registration statement filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission is not required to provide
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


information under this clause.
(B) The shareholders or participants in the applicant. An
applicant whose interests are publicly traded is required to
provide only the names of the persons holding an equity
interest of more than five percent (5%).
(4) An identification of any business, including the state of
incorporation or registration, if applicable, in which an
applicant, the spouse of the applicant, or a child of the
applicant has an equity interest of more than five percent
(5%).
(5) If the applicant has been indicted or convicted, has
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, or has forfeited bail
concerning a criminal offense under the laws of any
jurisdiction, the applicant must include the following
information:
(A) The name and location of the following:
(i) The court.
(ii) The arresting law enforcement agency.
(iii) The prosecuting attorney.
(B) The case number.
(C) The date and type of the criminal offense.
(D) The disposition of the case.
(E) The location and duration of any periods of
incarceration served by the applicant.
(6) If the applicant has had a license or a certificate issued by
a licensing authority in Indiana or any other jurisdiction
denied, restricted, suspended, revoked, or not renewed, the
applicant must provide the following information:
(A) A statement describing the facts and circumstances
concerning the authority's actions concerning the
applicant's license or certificate.
(B) The date of the authority's action concerning the
applicant's license or certificate.
(C) The reason for the authority's action concerning the
applicant's license or certificate.
(7) If the applicant:
(A) has filed or has had filed against the applicant a
proceeding in bankruptcy; or
(B) has been involved in a formal process to adjust, defer,
suspend, or work out the payment of a debt;
the applicant must provide the date of filing, the name and
location of the court, the case number of the proceeding, and
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


the disposition of the proceeding.
(8) If the applicant has filed or been served with a complaint
or notice filed with a public body concerning:
(A) a delinquency in the payment of; or
(B) a dispute over the filing of;
a return or the payment of a tax under federal, state, or local
law, the applicant must include the amount of the disputed
tax, the type of the disputed tax, the name of the taxing agency
involved, and the time involved in the tax dispute.
(9) A statement listing the names and positions of public
officials, public officers, and the relatives of public officials
and public officers who directly or indirectly:
(A) have a financial interest in;
(B) have a beneficial interest in;
(C) are the creditors of;
(D) hold a debt instrument issued by; or
(E) have an interest in a contractual or service relationship
with;
the applicant.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (b), if the applicant has
directly or indirectly made a political contribution, loan,
donation, or other payment to a candidate or an officeholder
in Indiana in the five (5) years before the date of the
application, the applicant must provide the amount and
method of the payment.
(11) The name and business telephone number of the attorney
who will represent the applicant in matters before the
commission.
(12) A description of the product or service to be
manufactured, distributed, or supplied by the applicant if the
applicant is applying for a manufacturer, distributor, or
supplier license.
(b) Subsection (a)(10) does not apply to an applicant for an
establishment license.
Sec. 3. (a) The following information that may be submitted,
collected, or gathered as part of an application for a license under
this article is confidential for purposes of IC 5-14-3-4:
(1) Any information concerning a minor child of the
applicant.
(2) The Social Security number of the applicant or the
applicant's spouse.
(3) The home telephone number of the applicant, the
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


applicant's spouse, or the children of the applicant.
(4) The applicant's birth certificate.
(5) The driver's license number of the applicant or the
applicant's spouse.
(6) The name or address of any former spouse of the
applicant.
(7) The date of birth of the applicant's spouse.
(8) The place of birth of the applicant's spouse.
(9) The personal financial records of the applicant, the
applicant's spouse, or a minor child of the applicant.
(10) Any information concerning the applicant being a victim
of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking.
(11) The electronic mail address of the applicant, the spouse
of an applicant, or a family member of an applicant.
(b) In addition to information that is confidential under
subsection (a), all information maintained by the commission
concerning an applicant who holds, has held, or has applied for a
license under this article:
(1) is confidential for purposes of IC 5-14-3; and
(2) may be released by the commission only for law
enforcement purposes or to a state agency.
Sec. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall
provide upon written request the following information:
(1) The information provided under section 2 of this chapter
concerning a licensee or an applicant.
(2) The aggregate amount of tax paid to the state by all of the
establishments located in each municipality or county.
(3) A copy of any documentation from the commission
providing the reasons for the denial, revocation, suspension,
or nonrenewal of a license.
(4) A copy of any documentation from the commission
providing the reasons for the commission's refusal to allow an
applicant to withdraw the applicant's application.
Chapter 5. Licensing of Persons
Sec. 1. (a) The commission may issue the following licenses
under this chapter to qualified applicants:
(1) A manufacturer license.
(2) A distributor license.
(3) A supplier license.
(4) An operator license.
(5) An establishment license.
(b) To obtain a license, a person must submit an application
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


form, an application fee, and any information requested by the
commission under this article.
(c) The commission shall, promptly and in reasonable order,
approve or reject all license applications received under this
article.
Sec. 2. The burden is on each applicant to demonstrate the
applicant's suitability for a license issued under this article. The
commission may issue or deny a license as provided by this article.
Sec. 3. An applicant for a license under this article must submit
to a background investigation conducted by the commission with
the assistance of the state police department or another law
enforcement agency.
Sec. 4. A person may not be licensed under this article if any of
the following apply:
(1) The applicant has knowingly made a false statement of
material fact to the commission.
(2) The applicant is found by the commission to lack the
necessary financial stability or responsibility to hold an
establishment license issued under this article.
(3) The applicant, if an individual, is less than twenty-one (21)
years of age on the date on which the application is received
by the commission.
(4) The applicant is on the most recent tax warrant list.
(5) The applicant, if an individual, has been convicted of or
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a crime set forth
in IC 35-45-5 or a crime of moral turpitude.
(6) The applicant, if an individual, has been convicted of or
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony under
Indiana law, the laws of any other state, or the laws of the
United States within the ten (10) years preceding the date of
the license application.
(7) The applicant, if an individual, has been convicted of or
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony under
Indiana law, the laws of any other state, or the laws of the
United States more than ten (10) years preceding the date of
the license application, unless the commission determines
that:
(A) the individual has been pardoned or the individual's
civil rights have been restored;
(B) after the conviction or entry of the plea, the individual
has engaged in the kind of law abiding commerce and good
citizenship that would reflect well upon the integrity of the
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


commission; or
(C) the individual has terminated a relationship with a
person whose actions directly contributed to the conviction
or entry of the plea.
(8) The applicant fails to provide all materials requested by
the commission.
(9) The applicant has a background, including a criminal
record, reputation, habits, social or business associations, or
prior activities, that poses a threat to the public interests of
the state or to the security and integrity of video gaming.
(10) The applicant may create or enhance the dangers of
unsuitable, unfair, or illegal practices, methods, and activities
in the conduct of video gaming.
(11) The applicant presents questionable business practices
and financial arrangements incidental to the conduct of video
gaming operations.
Sec. 5. The fact that an applicant:
(1) has faced charges of a crime described in section 4(5) or
4(6) of this chapter that were ultimately dismissed; or
(2) has been charged with a crime described in section 4(5) or
4(6) of this chapter, but not convicted of the crime;
is not sufficient grounds to disqualify the applicant for a license
under this article in the absence of other facts determined by the
commission to support a finding of unsuitability under section 4(9)
through 4(11) of this chapter.
Sec. 6. The costs of investigating an applicant for a license under
this chapter must be paid from the initial license fee paid by the
applicant under IC 4-39.5-13.
Sec. 7. The commission shall conduct or cause to be conducted
a background investigation of each applicant for a license issued
under this chapter.
Sec. 8. Criminal history record information obtained during the
investigation of an individual must be maintained by the
commission for the term of the license and for any subsequent
license term.
Sec. 9. The commission may require that an application or other
document submitted by an applicant or a licensee must be sworn
to or affirmed before a notary public.
Sec. 10. An applicant must furnish all information requested by
the commission, including financial data and documents,
certifications, consents, waivers, and individual histories.
Sec. 11. (a) An initial license issued under this chapter is valid
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


for one (1) year. A person holding a manufacturer license, a
distributor license, a supplier license, or an operator license may
annually renew the license if:
(1) the commission determines that the person satisfies the
conditions of this article; and
(2) the person pays the annual license renewal fee under
IC 4-39.5-13.
(b) A person holding a manufacturer license, a distributor
license, a supplier license, or an operator license is subject to a
complete investigation every three (3) years to determine that the
person is in compliance with this article. The costs of the
investigation must be paid from the license renewal fee paid under
IC 4-39.5-13.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), the commission may
investigate a person holding a manufacturer license, a distributor
license, a supplier license, or an operator license at any time the
commission determines that an investigation is necessary to ensure
that the person remains in compliance with this article.
Sec. 12. (a) The commission may issue an establishment license
to an applicant that satisfies the requirements of this article.
(b) An establishment license allows the licensee to conduct video
gaming under a video gaming terminal installation contract at the
street address specified in the licensee's application for the
establishment license. A person must obtain a separate
establishment license for each premises at which the person wishes
to conduct video gaming under a video gaming terminal
installation contract.
(c) An establishment license issued under this chapter is valid
for one (1) year. An establishment may annually renew the license
if:
(1) the commission determines that the establishment satisfies
the conditions of this article; and
(2) the establishment pays the annual license renewal fee
under IC 4-39.5-13.
Sec. 13. (a) To qualify for an establishment license, a person
must operate:
(1) a fraternal organization establishment, as defined by
IC 4-39.5-2-8;
(2) a veterans organization establishment, as defined by
IC 4-39.5-2-21;
(3) except as provided in subsection (b)(5), an establishment
licensed under IC 7.1-3 to sell alcoholic beverages to
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


customers for consumption on the premises of the
establishment; or
(4) a truck stop establishment, as defined by IC 4-39.5-2-19.
(b) The following may not apply for an establishment license
under this article:
(1) A person holding a horse track permit under IC 7.1-3-17.7.
(2) A licensed owner of a riverboat licensed under IC 4-33.
(3) An operating agent who operates a riverboat in a historic
hotel district under IC 4-33-6.5.
(4) A person holding a gambling game license issued under
IC 4-35-5.
(5) A person holding a permit issued under IC 7.1-3 for any of
the following:
(A) A boat permit.
(B) A hotel permit.
(C) A resort hotel permit.
(D) An airport permit.
(E) A satellite facility permit.
(F) A microbrewery permit.
(G) A social club permit.
(H) A civic center permit.
(I) A catering hall permit.
(J) A dining car permit.
(K) A temporary event permit.
(L) A permit for any of the following facilities:
(i) A stadium.
(ii) An automobile race track.
(iii) A concert hall.
(6) A person (other than a truck stop establishment) operating
a convenience store.
Sec. 14. If the commission proposes to revoke a license issued
under this chapter, the licensee may continue to operate under the
license until the commission has made a decision and all
administrative appeals have been exhausted by the licensee.
Chapter 6. Restrictions on Licensees and Other Persons
Sec. 1. A person holding a manufacturer license or a person
holding an interest in a person holding a manufacturer license may
not:
(1) hold an operator license;
(2) hold an establishment license; or
(3) own an equity interest in a person holding an operator
license or establishment license.
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


Sec. 2. A person holding a distributor license or a person
holding an interest in a person holding a distributor license may
not:
(1) hold an operator license;
(2) hold an establishment license; or
(3) own an equity interest in a person holding an operator
license or establishment license.
Sec. 3. A person holding a supplier license or a person holding
an interest in a person holding a supplier license may not:
(1) hold an establishment license; or
(2) own an equity interest in a person holding an
establishment license.
Sec. 4. A person holding an operator license or a person holding
an interest in a person holding an operator license may not:
(1) hold a manufacturer license;
(2) hold a distributor license;
(3) hold an establishment license; or
(4) own an equity interest in a person holding a manufacturer
license, a distributor license, or an establishment license.
Sec. 5. A person holding an establishment license or an owner or
a manager of a person holding an establishment license may not:
(1) hold a manufacturer license;
(2) hold a distributor license;
(3) hold a supplier license;
(4) hold an operator license; or
(5) own an equity interest in a person holding a manufacturer
license, a distributor license, a supplier license, or an operator
license.
Sec. 6. Notwithstanding sections 1 through 5 of this chapter, a
licensee may hold an otherwise prohibited equity interest of not
more than five percent (5%) in another person holding a license
under this article if the other person is registered with the
Securities and Exchange Commission.
Sec. 7. A person may not assemble, sell, lease, or contract to sell
or lease a video gaming terminal to a distributor unless the person
holds a valid manufacturer license.
Sec. 8. A person may not sell, lease, or contract to sell or lease
a video gaming terminal to an operator unless the person holds a
valid distributor license.
Sec. 9. A person may not place, install, or manage the operations
of a video gaming terminal or the major components or parts of a
video gaming terminal in an establishment unless the person holds
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


a valid operator license. A person may not own or lease a video
gaming terminal or major components or parts of a video gaming
terminal unless the person holds a valid operator license.
Sec. 10. A person may not service, maintain, repair, possess,
control, or have access to a video gaming terminal or major
components or parts of a video gaming terminal unless the person
holds a valid operator license under this article.
Sec. 11. (a) A manufacturer may not:
(1) be licensed as an operator; or
(2) own, control, or manage an establishment.
(b) A distributor may not:
(1) be licensed as an operator; or
(2) own, control, or manage an establishment.
(c) An operator may not:
(1) be licensed as a manufacturer or distributor; or
(2) own, control, or manage an establishment.
(d) An operator may contract only with other licensees under
this article.
Sec. 12. (a) An operator may not give anything of value,
including a loan or a financing arrangement, to any establishment
as an incentive or inducement to locate video gaming terminals in
that establishment.
(b) An establishment may not accept anything of value,
including a loan or a financing arrangement, from any person as
an incentive or inducement to locate video gaming terminals in that
establishment.
Chapter 7. Video Gaming Terminal Standards
Sec. 1. A licensee may not install a video gaming terminal in a
licensed establishment under a video gaming terminal installation
contract unless the video gaming terminal has been approved by
the commission.
Sec. 2. The commission may use the services of an independent
testing laboratory to test video gaming terminals for compliance
with this chapter.
Sec. 3. A video gaming terminal must do the following to satisfy
the requirements for approval under this chapter:
(1) Conform to all requirements of federal law, including
Class A Emissions Standards imposed under 47 CFR 15.
(2) Pay out a mathematically demonstrable percentage during
the service life of the terminal of at least eighty percent
(80%), but not more than ninety-five percent (95%).
(3) Use a random selection process to determine the outcome
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


of each play of a game.
(4) Use a random selection process that meets ninety-nine
percent (99%) confidence limits using a standard chi-square
test for goodness of fit.
(5) Display an accurate representation of the game outcome.
(6) Be capable of detecting and displaying the following
conditions during an idle state or on demand:
(A) Power reset.
(B) Door open.
(C) Door just closed.
(7) Be capable of displaying complete play history, including
outcome, intermediate play steps, credits available, bets
placed, credits paid, and credits cashed out, for the eleven (11)
games most recently played on the terminal.
(8) Allow for the replacement of parts or modules required
for normal maintenance without requiring the replacement of
the electromechanical meters.
(9) House in a locked area of the terminal meters that:
(A) are incapable of being reset; and
(B) keep a permanent record of the value of any electronic
card inserted into the terminal, all winnings made by the
terminal printer, credits played, and credits won by video
gaming players.
(10) Allow on demand display of the information recorded in
compliance with subdivision (9)(B).
(11) Use accounting software that keeps an electronic record
of at least the following information:
(A) The total value of all electronic cards inserted into the
terminal.
(B) The value of winning tickets claimed by players.
(C) The total credits played.
(D) The total credits awarded by the terminal.
(E) The payback percentage credited to the players of each
game.
(12) Link to a central communications system to provide
auditing program information required by the commission.
Sec. 4. The commission may not approve a video gaming
terminal:
(1) on which an automatic alteration of pay tables or any
function of the video gaming terminal through an internal
computation of hold percentage is possible;
(2) that is subject to any means of manipulation that affects
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


the random selection process or the probabilities of winning
a game; or
(3) that may be adversely affected by a static discharge or
other electromagnetic interference.
Sec. 5. The theoretical payback percentage of a video gaming
terminal may not be altered except by changing the hardware or
software of the video gaming terminal on site or through the
central communications system required by IC 4-39.5-9-5.
Sec. 6. The operator shall retain any electronically stored meter
information recorded in accordance with this chapter for at least
one hundred eighty (180) days after a loss of electric power to a
video gaming terminal in service at a licensed establishment.
Chapter 8. Video Gaming Terminal Installation Contract
Sec. 1. A video gaming terminal installation contract must
include the following terms and conditions:
(1) An affirmative statement that no inducement was offered
by the operator, the agent of the operator, or any other person
regarding the placement and operation of video gaming
terminals on the premises of the establishment.
(2) A provision prohibiting the operator from assigning the
contract to an unlicensed entity.
(3) A provision releasing the establishment from all
contractual obligations to the operator if the operator
surrenders its license, the license of the operator is revoked,
or the commission declines to renew the license of the
operator.
(4) A provision that indemnifies and holds harmless the state,
the commission, and any agent of the commission with respect
to a cause of action arising from the contract.
(5) A statement that the operator's obligation to place video
gaming terminals and the establishment's obligation to allow
the placement of video gaming terminals are both conditioned
upon the parties obtaining the necessary licenses to conduct
video gaming under this article.
Sec. 2. A video gaming terminal installation contract entered
into under this article must require the adjusted gross receipts
derived from video gaming to be allocated as follows:
(1) Thirty percent (30%) to the state in the form of taxes
remitted under IC 4-39.5-12.
(2) Thirty-five percent (35%) to the operator.
(3) Thirty-five percent (35%) to the establishment.
Chapter 9. Conduct of Video Gaming
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


Sec. 1. (a) In the case of an establishment licensed for the
consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises of the
establishment, a video gaming terminal may be played only during
the period beginning one (1) hour before the lawful consumption
of alcoholic beverages begins in the establishment and ending one
(1) hour after the lawful consumption of alcoholic beverages ends
in the establishment.
(b) An establishment that violates this section is subject to:
(1) the suspension, termination, or revocation of the
establishment's license; or
(2) other disciplinary action as determined by the commission.
Sec. 2. An operator must own or lease each video gaming
terminal installed under this article. An operator is responsible for
maintaining each video gaming terminal owned or leased by the
operator. An operator shall ensure that each video gaming
terminal owned or leased by the operator is in compliance with this
article and the requirements of the commission.
Sec. 3. (a) An operator must maintain liability insurance on any
video gaming terminal or equipment placed or installed in an
establishment by the operator.
(b) An establishment must maintain liability insurance on any
video gaming terminal or equipment placed or installed in the
establishment under a video gaming terminal installation contract
under IC 4-39.5-8.
(c) The commission shall determine the minimum amount of
insurance required by this section.
Sec. 4. An establishment shall conspicuously display the
following information on a poster or placard in the public area of
the establishment in which video gaming is conducted:
(1) The telephone number of the toll free telephone line
described in IC 4-33-12-9(c).
(2) That the area is restricted to individuals who are at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3) The telephone number of the operator.
Sec. 5. (a) An operator must ensure that each video gaming
terminal in Indiana is linked to a central communications system.
(b) The central communications system required by this section
must:
(1) have a game to system communication protocol;
(2) use a standard industry protocol approved by the
commission; and
(3) allow the commission or the operator to activate or
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


deactivate a particular video gaming terminal from a remote
location.
Sec. 6. An operator is liable for the video gaming wagering tax
imposed under IC 4-39.5-12.
Sec. 7. An operator shall display the odds of winning each game
on or near each video gaming terminal, including the manner in
which the odds are calculated.
Sec. 8. Each video gaming terminal in an establishment must be
installed in an area separated from the public spaces of the
establishment in which a minor may be present. The entrance to
the area must be within the view at all times of at least one (1)
employee who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. An
establishment may comply with this section by erecting a physical
barrier to the video gaming area, including a partition, gate, or
rope that is secured to the floor or walls.
Sec. 9. A maximum of five (5) video gaming terminals may be
installed in a particular licensed establishment.
Sec. 10. The cost of a credit must be one (1) of the following
amounts:
(1) One cent ($0.01).
(2) Five cents ($0.05).
(3) Ten cents ($0.10).
(4) Twenty-five cents ($0.25).
Sec. 11. The maximum amount that a patron may wager on a
particular game on any individual hand on a video gaming
terminal is two dollars ($2).
Sec. 12. The maximum amount that a patron may win on any
individual hand on a video gaming terminal is five hundred
ninety-nine dollars ($599).
Sec. 13. A video gaming terminal may not directly dispense cash,
coins, or any article of exchange or value other than a payment
ticket.
Sec. 14. A patron must be able to obtain a payment ticket at the
end of the patron's play by pressing a ticket dispensing button on
the video gaming terminal.
Sec. 15. A payment ticket must include the following
information:
(1) The total amount of credits and the amount of the cash
award, if any, won by the patron.
(2) The date and time that the payment ticket is dispensed.
(3) The serial number of the video gaming terminal.
(4) The sequential number of the payment ticket.
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


(5) An encrypted validation number from which the validity
of the cash award, if any, may be determined.
(6) The one (1) year expiration date of the payment ticket.
Sec. 16. A patron may collect any cash award won on a video
gaming terminal by submitting the payment ticket into a payout
device located in the establishment.
Sec. 17. The following persons may not wager on a video gaming
terminal:
(1) An employee of the commission.
(2) A person less than twenty-one (21) years of age.
Sec. 18. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), video gaming
may not be conducted at an establishment located within one
hundred (100) feet of a school or place of worship.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), video gaming may not
be conducted at an establishment located within one thousand
(1,000) feet of a riverboat regulated under IC 4-33 or a gambling
game facility regulated under IC 4-35.
(c) The prohibitions on video gaming near facilities described in
subsections (a) and (b) do not apply if a facility described in
subsection (a) or (b) is opened within the minimum distance of an
establishment after video gaming has commenced at the
establishment.
Chapter 10. Crimes and Penalties
Sec. 1. A person who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) makes a false statement on an application submitted under
this article;
(2) conducts video gaming in a manner other than the manner
required by this article; or
(3) permits a person less than twenty-one (21) years of age to
make a wager on a video gaming terminal;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. A licensee who knowingly or intentionally violates
IC 4-39.5-6-12 commits a Level 6 felony.
Sec. 3. The commission may impose a civil penalty of not more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon a licensee that permits a
person barred from wagering under IC 4-39.5-9-17 to place a
wager on a video gaming terminal.
Chapter 11. Judicial Review
Sec. 1. Except as provided in this article, IC 4-21.5 applies to
actions of the commission.
Sec. 2. An appeal of a final rule or order of the commission
issued under this article may be commenced under IC 4-21.5 in the
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


circuit court of the county containing an affected licensed
establishment.
Sec. 3. (a) The commission may require a licensee to suspend
video gaming operations without notice or hearing if the
commission determines that the safety or health of patrons or
employees would be threatened by the continued operation of video
gaming in the licensed establishment.
(b) The suspension of video gaming operations under this
section may remain in effect until the commission determines that
the cause for suspension has been abated. The commission may
revoke a license issued under this article if the commission
determines that the licensee has not made satisfactory progress
toward abating the hazard.
Chapter 12. Video Gaming Wagering Tax
Sec. 1. A tax is imposed on the adjusted gross receipts from
video gaming authorized under this article at the rate of thirty
percent (30%). Each operator owning or leasing a video gaming
terminal on which video gaming is conducted is liable for the tax
imposed by this section.
Sec. 2. An operator shall remit an amount equal to the thirty
percent (30%) tax imposed by section 1 of this chapter to the
department before the fifteenth day of the calendar month
following the calendar month in which the adjusted gross receipts
are received by the operator. The operator shall divide the
remaining seventy percent (70%) of the adjusted gross receipts as
provided in IC 4-39.5-8-2(2) and IC 4-39.5-8-2(3).
Sec. 3. The operator shall submit the following information to
the department on a form prescribed by the department before the
fifteenth day of each month:
(1) The total amount of adjusted gross receipts received from
video gaming in the previous month.
(2) The total amount of gross receipts received from video
gaming in the previous month.
(3) The total amount of taxes remitted under section 2 of this
chapter.
(4) The information required by subdivisions (1) through (3)
for each licensed establishment conducting video gaming on
video gaming terminals owned or leased by the operator in
the previous month.
(5) The location of each establishment conducting video
gaming on video gaming terminals owned or leased by the
operator in the previous month, including whether the
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


establishment is located in an unincorporated area of a
county.
Sec. 4. The department shall require payment under this
chapter to be made by electronic funds transfer (as defined by
IC 4-8.1-2-7(f)).
Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the department
shall do the following with the tax revenue remitted to the
department each month under section 2 of this chapter:
(1) Set aside thirty-five percent (35%) of the tax revenue for
a quarterly allocation to the municipality where the licensed
establishment conducting video gaming on video gaming
terminals owned or leased by the operator that submitted the
taxes is located.
(2) Set aside thirty-five percent (35%) of the tax revenue for
a quarterly allocation to the county where the licensed
establishment conducting video gaming on video gaming
terminals owned or leased by the operator that submitted the
taxes is located.
(3) Deposit thirty percent (30%) of the tax revenue in the state
general fund.
(b) If tax revenue is collected from an operator that operates in
an unincorporated area of a county, the department shall do the
following with the tax revenue remitted to the department each
month under section 2 of this chapter:
(1) Set aside seventy percent (70%) of the tax revenue for a
quarterly allocation to the county where the licensed
establishment conducting video gaming on video gaming
terminals owned or leased by the operator that submitted the
taxes is located.
(2) Deposit thirty percent (30%) of the tax revenue in the state
general fund.
(c) A county may use the tax revenue received under this section
only for the following purposes:
(1) Mental health treatment for jail inmates.
(2) Addiction interventions for jail inmates.
(3) Contributions to the pension fund of the county's sheriff's
department.
(4) Training and equipment for the county's sheriff's
department.
(d) A municipality may use the tax revenue received under this
section only for the following purposes:
(1) Mental health treatment for jail inmates.
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


(2) Addiction interventions for jail inmates.
(3) Contributions to the 1977 police officers' and firefighters'
pension and disability fund established by IC 36-8-8-4.
(4) Training and equipment for the police department of the
municipality.
Chapter 13. License Fees
Sec. 1. The commission shall charge the following initial license
fees:
(1) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for an initial
manufacturer license, an initial distributor license, or an
initial supplier license issued to a person residing or domiciled
in Indiana.
(2) Thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) for an initial
manufacturer license, an initial distributor license, or an
initial supplier license issued to a person residing or domiciled
in a state other than Indiana or a country other than the
United States.
(3) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for an initial operator
license issued to a person residing or domiciled in Indiana.
(4) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for an initial
operator license issued to a person residing or domiciled in a
state other than Indiana or a country other than the United
States.
(5) Five hundred dollars ($500) for an initial establishment
license.
Sec. 2. (a) A person holding a distributor license, a
manufacturer license, or a supplier license shall pay an annual
license renewal fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(b) A person holding an operator license shall pay an annual
license renewal fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(c) The commission shall charge each person holding an
establishment license the following annual license renewal fees:
(1) One hundred dollars ($100) for a licensed establishment
that had adjusted gross receipts of less than twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) in the previous twelve (12)
calendar months.
(2) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a licensed
establishment that had adjusted gross receipts of at least
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) but less than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) in the previous twelve (12)
calendar months.
(3) Five hundred dollars ($500) for a licensed establishment
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


that had adjusted gross receipts of at least fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) but less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in the previous twelve (12) calendar months.
(4) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a licensed establishment
that had adjusted gross receipts of at least one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) in the previous twelve (12)
calendar months.
Sec. 3. A licensee shall pay the annual license renewal fee due
under section 2 of this chapter on the first day of the calendar
month containing the anniversary date of the issuance of the
licensee's establishment license.
Sec. 4. The commission shall deposit the following into the state
general fund:
(1) All fees collected under this chapter.
(2) All application fees received under IC 4-39.5-5.
SECTION 4. IC 6-8.1-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2023,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. "Listed taxes" or "taxes" includes only the
pari-mutuel taxes (IC 4-31-9-3 through IC 4-31-9-5); the supplemental
wagering tax (IC 4-33-12); the riverboat wagering tax (IC 4-33-13); the
slot machine wagering tax (IC 4-35-8); the type II gambling game
excise tax (IC 4-36-9); the video gaming wagering tax (IC
4-39.5-12); the gross income tax (IC 6-2.1) (repealed); the utility
receipts and utility services use taxes (IC 6-2.3) (repealed); the state
gross retail and use taxes (IC 6-2.5); the adjusted gross income tax (IC
6-3); the pass through entity tax (IC 6-3-2.1); the supplemental net
income tax (IC 6-3-8) (repealed); the county adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3.5-1.1) (repealed); the county option income tax (IC 6-3.5-6)
(repealed); the county economic development income tax (IC 6-3.5-7)
(repealed); the local income tax (IC 6-3.6); the auto rental excise tax
(IC 6-6-9); the financial institutions tax (IC 6-5.5); the gasoline tax (IC
6-6-1.1); the special fuel tax (IC 6-6-2.5); the motor carrier fuel tax (IC
6-6-4.1); a motor fuel tax collected under a reciprocal agreement under
IC 6-8.1-3; the vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5); the aviation fuel excise
tax (IC 6-6-13); the commercial vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5.5); the
excise tax imposed on recreational vehicles and truck campers (IC
6-6-5.1); the hazardous waste disposal tax (IC 6-6-6.6) (repealed); the
heavy equipment rental excise tax (IC 6-6-15); the vehicle sharing
excise tax (IC 6-6-16); the cigarette tax (IC 6-7-1); the closed system
cartridge tax (IC 6-7-2-7.5); the electronic cigarette tax (IC 6-7-4); the
beer excise tax (IC 7.1-4-2); the liquor excise tax (IC 7.1-4-3); the wine
excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4); the hard cider excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4.5); the
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125


petroleum severance tax (IC 6-8-1); the various innkeeper's taxes (IC
6-9); the various food and beverage taxes (IC 6-9); the county
admissions tax (IC 6-9-13 and IC 6-9-28); the oil inspection fee (IC
16-44-2); the penalties assessed for oversize vehicles (IC 9-20-3 and
IC 9-20-18); the fees and penalties assessed for overweight vehicles (IC
9-20-4 and IC 9-20-18); and any other tax or fee that the department is
required to collect or administer.
SECTION 5. IC 35-45-5-15.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.5. This chapter does not apply
to video gaming authorized by IC 4-39.5.
SECTION 6. IC 35-52-4-36 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 36. IC 4-39.5-10-1 defines a crime concerning video
gaming.
SECTION 7. IC 35-52-4-37 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 37. IC 4-39.5-10-2 defines a crime concerning video
gaming.
2026 IN 1235—LS 6864/DI 125